Hawaii statutes.
§166E-2 Definitions. For the purposes
of this chapter:

"Agricultural activities" means the
care and production of livestock, livestock products, poultry, or poultry
products, or apiary, horticultural, or floricultural products, or the planting,
cultivating, and harvesting of crops or trees.

"Aquacultural activities" means the
farming or ranching or any plant or animal species in a controlled salt,
brackish, or freshwater environment; provided that the farm or ranch is on or
directly adjacent to land.

"Board" means the board of
agriculture.

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Non-agricultural park lands" means
lands that are not designated as agricultural parks pursuant to chapter 166. [L
2003, c 90, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 157, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next